test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kualazh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kuâlaž a-stem little fish/pikku kala: # Noun - full paradigm
     kuâlaž+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: kuâlaž
     kuâlaž+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: kuâla
     kuâlaž+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: kuâla
     kuâlaž+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: kuâlže
     kuâlaž+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: kuâlast
     kuâlaž+N+Sg+Com+Indef: kuâlain
     kuâlaž+N+Ess+Indef: kuâlžen
     kuâlaž+N+Par+Indef: kuâlžed
     kuâlaž+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [kuâlaʹtaa, kuâlaʹtää]
     kuâlaž+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: kuâla
     kuâlaž+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: kuâlai
     kuâlaž+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: kuâlaid
     kuâlaž+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: kuâlaid
     kuâlaž+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: kuâlain
     kuâlaž+N+Pl+Com+Indef: kuâlaivuiʹm
     kuâlaž+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [kuâlaitaa, kuâlaitää]
